Utah statutes.
77-2-1.1.   Signing and filing of information.

The prosecuting attorney shall sign all informations.  The prosecuting attorney may:

(1)  sign the information in the presence of a magistrate; or

(2)  present and file the information in the office of the clerk where the prosecution is commenced upon the signature of the prosecuting attorney.

